Tennessee, session 114, HB1939.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 37-5-132, is amended by deleting the
section and substituting:
(a) The department shall maintain staffing levels of case managers so that each
region has enough case managers to ensure that caseloads do not exceed:
(1) Twelve (12) active cases involving no more than twelve (12) families
relating to initial assessments, including investigations of an allegation of child
abuse or neglect; or
(2) Twenty (20) children monitored and supervised in active cases
relating to ongoing services.
(b) The department shall comply with the maximum caseload limits described in
subsection (a).
(c) The department shall resolve each active case within twelve (12) months of
the opening of the case. If the department does not resolve an active case within twelve
(12) months, then the case must be brought before the juvenile court for a status review
hearing to determine what specific actions are necessary to resolve the case. At the
status review hearing, the court must issue specific and clear instructions regarding
actions that must be completed by the parties for a timely resolution of the case.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1939
011582
- 1 -